Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.328

Waivers of tuition and fees—Scholarships—Employment of instructional staff and faculty—Seattle Vocational Institute.

The district may provide for waivers of tuition and fees and provide scholarships for students at the institute. The district may negotiate with applicable public or private service providers to conduct the instructional activities of the institute. The district may employ instructional staff or faculty. The district may also contract with private individuals for instructional services. Until at least July 1, 1993, all faculty and staff serve at the pleasure of the district. In order to allow the district flexibility in its personnel policies with the institute, the district and the institute, with reference to employees of the institute employed during an initial two-year period until July 1, 1993, are exempt from chapters *28B.16, 28B.52 (relating to collective bargaining), 41.04, 41.05, 41.06, and 41.40 RCW; from RCW 43.01.040 through 43.01.044; and from RCW 28B.50.551 and 28B.50.850 through 28B.50.875 (relating to faculty tenure).

[ 1991 c 238 s 103.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 28B.16 RCW was repealed by 1993 c 281, with the exception of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.16.240, which was recodified as RCW 41.06.382. The powers, duties, and functions of the state higher education personnel board were transferred to the Washington personnel resources board. RCW 28B.16.015 and 41.06.382 were subsequently repealed by 2002 c 354 s 403, effective July 1, 2005.